test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_n_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kaja: # 
    kaja+N+Abs: kaja
    kaja+N+Erg: kajalu
    kaja+N+Dat: kajaku
    kaja+N+Der/Hav+Abs: kajakurlu
    kaja+N+Der/Anoth+Erg: kajakujupalu
    kaja+N+Der/Contr+Dat: kajamunuku
    kaja+N+Abl: [kajajanu, kajanguru]
    kaja+N+Gen: kajakurnu
    kaja+N+Loc: kajangka
    kaja+N+Avoid: kajangkamarra
    kaja+N+Perl: kajawana
    kaja+N+All: kajakutu
    kaja+N+Loc+Der/Hav: kajangkakurlu
    kaja+N+Gen+Abl: [kajakurnujanu, kajakurnunguru]
    kaja+N+Loc+Abl: [kajangkajanu, kajangkanguru]
    kaja+N+Perl+Abl: [kajawanajanu, kajawananguru]
    kaja+N+All+Abl: [kajakutujanu, kajakutunguru]
